Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-115
Dependence, defined.

Dependence means a maladaptive pattern of alcohol or substance use, leading to clinically significant impairment or distress, as manifested by three or more of the following occurring at any time in the same twelve-month period:

(1) Tolerance as defined by either of the following:

(a) A need for markedly increased amounts of alcohol or the substance to achieve intoxication or desired effect; or

(b) A markedly diminished effect with continued use of the same amount of alcohol or the substance;

(2) Withdrawal as manifested by either of the following:

(a) The characteristic withdrawal syndrome for alcohol or the substance as referred to in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders — Fourth Edition, published by the American Psychiatric Association; or

(b) Alcohol or the same substance or a closely related substance is taken to relieve or avoid withdrawal symptoms;

(3) Alcohol or the substance is often taken in larger amounts or over a longer period than was intended;

(4) A persistent desire or unsuccessful efforts to cut down or control alcohol or substance use;

(5) A great deal of time is spent in activities necessary to obtain alcohol or the substance, to use alcohol or the substance, or to recover from the effects of use of alcohol or the substance;

(6) Important social, occupational, or recreational activities are given up or reduced because of alcohol or substance use; or

(7) Alcohol or substance use continues despite knowledge of having had a persistent or recurrent physical or psychological problem that was likely to have been caused or exacerbated by alcohol or the substance.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 15.